da: Proteinforarbejdningstype: Blanding; Klart protein; Koncentrat; Fermenteret; Hydrolyseret; Isolat; Micellær; Andet
de: Proteinverarbeitungstyp: Mischung; Klares Protein; Konzentrat; Fermentiert; Hydrolysiert; Isolat; Mizellar; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 蛋白質加工類型: 調配; 清澈蛋白質; 濃縮; 發酵; 水解; 分離物; 膠束; 其他
sk-SK: Typ spracovania bielkovín: Zmes; Číry proteín; Koncentrát; Fermentovaný; Hydrolyzovaný; Izolát; Micelárny; Iné
cs: Typ zpracování proteinu: Směs; Čirý protein; Koncentrát; Fermentovaný; Hydrolyzovaný; Izolát; Micelární; Jiné
ja: プロテイン処理タイプ: ブレンド; クリアプロテイン; コンセントレート; 発酵; 加水分解; アイソレート; ミセラー; その他
lt-LT: Baltymų perdirbimo tipas: Mišinys; Skaidrus baltymas; Koncentratas; Fermentuotas; Hidrolizuotas; Izoliatas; Micelinis; Kita
en: Protein processing type: Blend; Clear protein; Concentrate; Fermented; Hydrolyzed; Isolate; Micellar; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de processamento de proteína: Mistura; Proteína transparente; Concentrado; Fermentado; Hidrolisado; Isolado; Micelar; Outro
nl: Type eiwitverwerking: Blend; Heldere proteïne; Concentraat; Gefermenteerd; Gehydrolyseerd; Isolaat; Micellair; Andere
zh-CN: 蛋白质加工类型: 混合; 透明蛋白; 浓缩液; 发酵; 水解; 分离; 胶束; 其他
th: ประเภทการแปรรูปโปรตีน: ผสม; โปรตีนใส; แบบเข้มข้น; หมัก; ไฮโดรไลซ์; ไอโซเลต; ไมเซลล่า; อื่นๆ
fi: Proteiinin käsittelytyyppi: Sekoitus; Kirkas proteiini; Tiiviste; Fermentoitu; Hydrolysoitu; Isolaatti; Misellaarinen; Muu
pl: Typ przetwarzania białka: Mieszanka; Czyste białko; Koncentrat; Fermentowany; Hydrolizowany; Izolat; Micelarny; Inne
el: Τύπος επεξεργασίας πρωτεΐνης: Μείγμα; Διαυγής πρωτεΐνη; Συμπύκνωμα; Ζυμωμένη; Υδρολυμένη; Απομόνωμα; Μικκυλιακή; Άλλο
es: Tipo de procesamiento de proteína: Mezcla; Proteína clara; Concentrado; Fermentado; Hidrolizado; Aislado; Micelar; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de processamento de proteína: Mistura; Proteína transparente; Concentrado; Fermentado; Hidrolisado; Isolado; Micelar; Outro
vi: Loại xử lý đạm: Hỗn hợp; Protein trong suốt; Cô đặc; Lên men; Thủy phân; Phân lập; Micellar; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta obrade proteina: Mješavina; Bistri protein; Koncentrat; Fermentirano; Hidrolizirano; Izolat; Micelarni; Ostalo
fr: Type de traitement des protéines: Mélange; Protéine transparente; Concentré; Fermenté; Hydrolysé; Isolat; Micellaire; Autre
ko: 단백질 처리 유형: 블렌드; 클리어 프로틴; 농축; 발효; 가수분해; 분리물; 미셀러; 기타
hu: Fehérjefeldolgozás típusa: Keverék; Tiszta fehérje; Koncentrátum; Fermentált; Hidrolizált; Izolátum; Micelláris; Egyéb
sv: Proteinbearbetningstyp: Blandning; Klart protein; Koncentrat; Fermenterat; Hydrolyserat; Isolat; Micellärt; Övrigt
ru: Тип обработки белка: Смесь; Прозрачный протеин; Концентрат; Ферментированный; Гидролизованный; Изолят; Мицеллярный; Другой
tr: Protein işleme türü: Harman; Berrak protein; Konsantre; Fermente; Hidrolize; İzolat; Misellar; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de procesare proteine: Amestec; Proteină limpede; Concentrat; Fermentat; Hidrolizat; Izolat; Micelar; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta predelave beljakovin: Mešanica; Bistra beljakovina; Koncentrat; Fermentirano; Hidrolizirano; Izolat; Micelarni; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип обработка на протеин: Смес; Прозрачен протеин; Концентрат; Ферментирал; Хидролизиран; Изолат; Мицеларен; Други
nb: Proteinbehandlingstype: Blanding; Klart protein; Konsentrat; Fermentert; Hydrolysert; Isolat; Micellær; Annet
it: Tipo di lavorazione delle proteine: Miscela; Proteina trasparente; Concentrato; Fermentato; Idrolizzato; Isolato; Micellare; Altro